Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2338.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XV-OSAFEGUARDING PERSONAL EXPRESSION AT K-12 SCHOOLSSection 1501-O. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"School entity." A school district, charter school, cyber charter school, private school, nonpublic school, intermediate unit or area career and technical school operating within this 1234567891011121314151617181920 Commonwealth."Student." An individual who is enrolled at a school entity on a full-time or part-time basis.Section 1502-O. Protections for student speech and expression.(a) Policies.--Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, a school entity shall adopt policies or amend the school entity's existing policies for the purpose of complying with this article. The policies shall include rights and responsibilities of students in accordance with this article and 22 Pa. Code § 12.9 (relating to freedom of expression).(b) Freedom of expression.--No student shall be discriminated against or penalized by the school entity for engaging in religious, political or ideological speech or expressing a religious, political or ideological viewpoint in the same time, place and manner and to the same extent that other similarly situated students may engage in speech or express views at the school entity.(c) Protected speech or expression.--A student may engage in protected speech or expression at a school entity, including, but not limited to:(1) Expressing a religious, political or ideological viewpoint on the topic or subject of discussion or study inside of class.(2) Expressing religious, political or ideological viewpoints in a homework assignment, artwork, presentation or other written or oral assignments without discrimination or academic penalty based on the religious, political or ideological content of the student's submissions. The student's work must be assessed by ordinary academic standards of substance and relevance and against other 20260HB2338PN3112 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 legitimate pedagogical concerns identified by the school entity.(3) Organizing religious, political or ideological gatherings before, during or after school to the same extent and with the same access to school facilities as other student-initiated gatherings are permitted.(d) Student organizations.--One or more students may organize religious, political or ideological clubs before, during and after school to the same extent and with the same access to school facilities and to all benefits and privileges that are afforded to other clubs authorized by the school entity. The school entity shall not discriminate against a student club because of:(1) the religious, political or ideological viewpoints expressed by the students or the organization; or(2) any requirement that the leaders or members of the club affirm and adhere to the organization's sincerely held beliefs, comply with the organization's standards of conduct or further the organization's mission or purpose, as defined by the student organization.Section 1503-O. Limitations.Nothing in this article shall be interpreted as preventing a school entity from prohibiting, limiting or restricting:(1) expression that the First Amendment of the Constitution of the United States does not protect, such as true threats, obscenity and expression directed to provoke imminent lawless actions and likely to produce it;(2) expression that is unwelcome and so severe, pervasive and subjectively and objectively offensive that a student is effectively denied equal access to educational 20260HB2338PN3112 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 opportunities or benefits provided by the school entity; and(3) conduct that intentionally, materially and substantially disrupts:(i) the operations of the school entity; or(ii) the expressive activity of another individual if that activity is occurring in a space reserved for that activity under the exclusive use or control of a particular student, group of students or club.Section 1504-O. Remedies for violation.(a) Private cause of action.--A student who is harmed by a violation of this article or whose rights under this article are violated shall have a private cause of action against the school entity for declaratory and injunctive relief, monetary damages, reasonable attorney fees, costs and any other appropriate relief.(b) Defense or counterclaim.--A student or student organization aggrieved by a violation of this article may assert the violation as a defense or counterclaim in any disciplinary action or in any civil or administrative proceedings brought against the student or student organization.(c) Other remedies not limited.--Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to limit any other remedies available to a student or student organization.Section 1505-O. Statute of limitations.A student or student organization shall be required to bring suit for a violation of this article not later than two years after the day the cause of action accrues. For purposes of calculating the two-year limitation period, each day that the violation persists, and each day that a policy in violation of this article remains in effect, shall constitute a new day that 20260HB2338PN3112 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the cause of action has accrued.Section 1506-O. Immunity.The State waives immunity under the Eleventh Amendment of the Constitution of the United States and consents to suit in a Federal court for lawsuits arising out of this article. A school entity that violates this article is not immune from suit or liability for the violation.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2338PN3112 - 5 - 12345678